trunk/incubator/apertium-mk-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="/personal_pronouns__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mua</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mua</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>meje</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teje</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atij</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tij</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atij</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atij</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asaj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asaj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asaj</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neve</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nesh</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juve</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jush</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ato</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ato</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ato</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ato</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atyre</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="/personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
